Utah statutes.
4-32-11.   Preparation and slaughter of livestock, poultry, or livestock and poultry products -- Adulterated or misbranded products -- Violation of rule or order.

(1)  An animal or meat or poultry product that may be used for human consumption shall not be:

(a)  slaughtered or prepared unless it is done in compliance with this chapter's requirements;

(b)  sold, transported, offered for sale or transportation, or received for transportation, if it is adulterated or misbranded, unless it has been inspected and approved; or

(c)  subjected to any act while being transported or held for sale after transportation resulting in one of the products becoming adulterated or being misbranded.

(2)  A person may not violate any rule or order of the commissioner under Subsection 4-32-7(3) or (6), or Subsection 4-32-8(3), (5), (7), or (14).

